Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-10,101
School of cosmetology license; school of esthetics license; application; review; procedure; inspection.

Each application for a license to operate a school of cosmetology or school of esthetics shall be reviewed by the department for compliance with the requirements of the Cosmetology, Electrology, Esthetics, Nail Technology, and Body Art Practice Act. If an application is denied, the applicant shall be informed in writing of the grounds for denial and such denial shall not prejudice future applications by the applicant. If an application is accepted, the department shall immediately conduct an accreditation inspection of the proposed school. A school passing the inspection shall be issued a license and may begin operation as soon as the inspection results are received. If the proposed school fails the inspection, the applicant shall submit, within fifteen days, evidence of corrective action taken to improve those aspects of operation found deficient. If, after a second inspection to be conducted within thirty days of receipt of evidence, the school does not receive a satisfactory rating, or if evidence is not received within fifteen days, the application may be denied.

Laws 1986, LB 318, § 100;

Laws 1995, LB 83, § 41;

Laws 2002, LB 241, § 37;

Laws 2004, LB 1005, § 32;

R.S.Supp.,2006, § 71-3,139;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 363.